Massachusetts, session 194th, H442.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 138 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by inserting the following section:-  
Section 12D. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the local 
licensing authority in a city or town that votes to authorize the granting of licenses for the sale of 
alcoholic beverages may grant temporary licenses for the sale of alcoholic beverages to be drunk 
on the premises to applicants that are nonprofit charitable corporations organized under chapter 
180 and registered with the non-profit organizations and public charities division of the office of 
the attorney general.    
Each such temporary license shall describe the premises to which it applies and shall be 
granted only for the premises that are the principal place of business or headquarters of the 
applicant and that are legally zoned to allow such sales, or that are the premises of a licensee 
under section 12. The temporary license shall not be valid for more than 10 consecutive calendar 

of 7 13 days and a holder of any such temporary license shall not be granted more than 2 such licenses in 
a calendar year. A holder of a temporary license under this subsection shall be permitted to 
conduct such sales on any day and at any time permitted under said section 12. Any alcoholic 
beverages sold under this subsection shall be donated at no charge to the license holder and any 
alcoholic beverages donated may be dispensed by the employees or agents of the donors 
of such beverages, without compensation for the dispensing services. All proceeds from such 
sales shall be used for the license holder’s charitable purpose.    
The fee for the temporary license shall not exceed the minimum fee provided for holders 
of licenses to sell alcoholic beverages. The application procedures under section 15A shall not 
apply to temporary licenses under this subsection; provided, however, that such applications may 
be granted by the local licensing authority according to the local procedures for granting licenses 
under section 14.    
(b) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the local licensing 
authority in a city or town that votes to authorize the granting of licenses for the sale of alcoholic 
beverages may grant temporary licenses for the sale of alcoholic beverages to be drunk on the 
premises, to joint applicants that consist of not less than 1 nonprofit charitable corporation 
organized under chapter 180 and registered with the non-profit organizations and public charities 
division of the office of the attorney general and a licensee under section 12.    
The temporary license shall describe the premises to which it applies and shall be granted 
only for the premises of the joint applicant that is a licensee under said section 12. The temporary 
license shall not be valid for more than 10 consecutive calendar days and a holder of any such 
temporary license shall not be granted more than 2 such licenses in a calendar year. A holder of a 

of 7 35 temporary license under this subsection shall be permitted to conduct such sales on any day and 
at any time permitted under said section 12. Any alcoholic beverages sold under this 
section shall be donated at no charge to the license holder and any alcoholic beverages donated 
may be dispensed by the employees or agents of the donor of such beverages without 
compensation for the dispensing services. A majority of the proceeds from such sales shall be 
used for the charitable corporation license holder's charitable purposes.    
The fee for such temporary license shall not exceed the minimum fee provided for 
holders of licenses to sell alcoholic beverages at retail. The application procedures under section 
15A shall not apply to such temporary licenses under this subsection; provided, however, that 
such applications may be granted by the local licensing authority according to the local 
procedures for granting licenses under section 14.    
SECTION 2. Section 14 of said chapter 138, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
striking the second paragraph in its entirety.   
SECTION 3. Chapter 138 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out section 
14A, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, and inserting in place thereof the following 
section:-   
Section 14A.(a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the licensing 
authority in any city or town that votes to authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages may grant 
licenses for the sale of alcoholic beverages at auctions, not to be drunk on the premises, to an 
applicant that is licensed as an auctioneer pursuant to chapter 100 for not less than 10 years. Each 
license shall describe the premises to which it applies and shall be granted only for the premises 
which are either the principal place of business or headquarters of the applicant and legally 

of 7 57 zoned to allow such sales or which are the premises of a licensee under section 12 or section 15. 
The fee for the license shall not exceed the minimum fee for holders of licenses under section 14. 
A holder of a license for the sale of alcoholic beverages at auctions may conduct any such 
auction on any day and at any time permitted under section 12. Applications shall be granted by 
the licensing authority according to the local procedure for granting licenses under said section 
14.    
A licensee who holds a license under this section may provide, without charge, on-
premises sample alcoholic beverages tastings for prospective customers if such beverages shall 
be available for sale at auction on those premises; provided, however, that no single serving of 
wine shall exceed 1 ounce, no single serving of malt beverages shall exceed 3 ounces and no 
single serving of distilled spirits shall exceed 1/4 of an ounce; and provided further, that the 
licensee shall control the dispensing of the alcoholic beverages.   
(b) The local licensing authority in a city or town that votes to authorize the granting of 
licenses for the sale of alcoholic beverages may grant temporary licenses for the sale of alcoholic 
beverages at auction not to be drunk on the premises to applicants that are nonprofit charitable 
corporations organized under chapter 180 and registered with the non-profit organizations and 
public charities division of the office of the attorney general.    
Each such temporary license shall describe the premises to which the license applies and 
shall be granted only for premises that are the principal place of business or headquarters of the 
applicant, or a location owned or leased by the applicant from which the applicant regularly 
conducts business and which are legally zoned to allow such sales, or which are the premises of a 
licensee under section 12 or 15.    

of 7 79  No such temporary licenses shall be valid for more than 10 consecutive calendar days and 
a holder of a temporary license shall not be granted more than 5 such temporary licenses in a 
calendar year. A holder of a temporary license under this subsection may conduct such auctions 
on any day and at any time permitted under said section 12. Any alcoholic beverages sold under 
this section shall be donated at no charge to the license holder and all proceeds from such sales 
shall be used for the license holder's charitable purposes.    
The fee for a temporary license under this subsection shall not exceed the minimum fee 
provided for holders of licenses to sell alcoholic beverages at retail. The application procedures 
under section 15A shall not apply to temporary licenses under this subsection; provided, 
however, that such applications may be granted by the local licensing authority according to the 
local procedures for the granting licenses under section 14.    
(c) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the local licensing 
authority in a city or town which votes to authorize the granting of licenses for the sale of 
alcoholic beverages may grant temporary licenses for the sale of alcoholic beverages at auctions, 
not to be drunk on the premises, to applicants that are licensees under section 15 of chapter 138.    
Each such temporary license shall describe the premises to which it applies and shall be 
granted only for premises that are the principal place of business or headquarters of the applicant 
and which are legally zoned to allow such sales or which are the premises of a licensee under 
said section 15. The temporary license shall not be valid for more than 10 consecutive calendar 
days and a holder of any such temporary license shall not be granted more than 2 such temporary 
licenses in a calendar year. A holder of a temporary license under this subsection shall be 
100 permitted to conduct such auctions on any day and at any time permitted under said section 15.    

of 7 101  The fee for the temporary license shall not exceed the minimum fee provided for holders 
102 of licenses to sell alcoholic beverages at retail. The application procedures under section 15A 
103 shall not apply to temporary licenses under this subsection; provided, however, that such 
104 applications may be granted by the local licensing authority according to the local procedures for 
105 granting licenses under section 14.    
106  (d) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the local licensing 
107 authority in a city or town which votes to authorize the granting of licenses for the sale of an 
108 alcoholic beverage may grant temporary licenses for the sale of alcoholic beverages at auction 
109 not to be drunk on the premises to joint applicants which consist of not less than 1 nonprofit 
110 charitable corporation organized under chapter 180 and registered with the non-profit 
111 organizations and public charities division of the office of the attorney general and a licensee 
112 under section 12 or 15.    
113  The temporary license shall describe the premises to which it applies and shall be granted 
114 only for the premises of the joint applicant that is a licensee under said section 12 or 15. The 
115 temporary license shall not be valid for more than 10 consecutive calendar days and a holder of 
116 any such temporary license shall not be granted more than 2 such licenses in a calendar year. A 
117 holder of a temporary license under this subsection shall be permitted to conduct such sales on 
118 any day and at any time permitted under said section 12. Any alcoholic beverages sold under this 
119 subsection shall be donated at no charge to the license holder. A majority of the proceeds from 
120 such sales shall be used for the charitable corporation license holder's charitable purposes.    
121  The fee for such temporary license shall not exceed the minimum fee provided for 
122 holders of licenses to alcoholic beverages at retail. The application procedures under section 15A 

of 7 123 shall not apply to such temporary licenses under this subsection; provided, however, that such 
124 applications may be granted by the local licensing authority according to the local procedures for 
125 granting licenses under section 14.    
126  SECTION 4. Chapter 153 of the acts of 1997, as most recently amended by chapter 405 
127 of the acts of 2012, is hereby repealed.